Biker reacts at lightning speed and prevents worse things
On Friday night, a traffic accident occurred on the highway between Machtolsheim and Merklingen, in which a motorcyclist was only slightly injured thanks to his quick reaction.
Car driver overlooked biker
A 44-year-old woman wanted to take her VW from Merklingen to the left on the state road 1230 in the direction of Machtolsheim.
She overlooked the 24-year-old motorcyclist coming from the direction of Nellingen.
Hand and foot brake levers fly away during the collision
The biker tried to evade the car, but he still rubbed it at the rear of the vehicle.
As a result of the stripping, the hand and foot brake levers on the Suzuki were torn down and the driver was no longer able to brake down.
At the moment, he controlled his motorcycle in the green stiffeners next to the road and let it roll out there without falling.
Biker suffers leg injury
Due to the collision with the car, the biker nevertheless suffered an injury to the bei and had to be treated in a clinic.
Mamming: Corona Mass Infection: 174 Harvesters Infected
After a Corona mass infection on a large vegetable farm in Mamming in Lower Bavaria, almost 500 people are quarantined and are no longer allowed to leave the farm.
A security service monitors the ban.
A total of 174 harvesters were tested positive for the Corona pathogen Sars-CoV-2 during the in-line investigation, as reported by the Landratsamt Dingolfing-Landau on Saturday evening.
"Unfortunately, in order to avoid further expansion, we have to take this step to protect the population," said District Administrator Werner Bumeder (CSU).
Previously, seven employees had already been infected in the company - this was the reason for the series test.
The farm is a large vegetable farm that grows strawberries, cucumbers, cabbage and beetroot - but the cucumbers only for insertion glasses.
Mamming is a rural community with a population of about 3,300 not far from Dingolfing with its large BMW plant.
Bumeder appealed to the citizens to keep calm: "According to our information, it is a closed group of people".
On the farm were infected by uninfected employees separated, the site is now surrounded by a barrier fence.
The Greens and the SPD shared responsibility for the state government.
The two opposition factions accused Prime Minister Markus Söder (CSU) and his cabinet of neglecting the control of the housing of seasonal workers.
"This can be a bitter revenge if such local infection events have to be eliminated and regional lockdowns ordered," said Jürgen Mistol, the parliamentary director of the Greens.
The SPD sees this very similarly: "After the Corona eruption in the Wiesenhof slaughterhouse in mid-May, we have already demanded a special control program for farms with crop helpers," said environmental expert Florian von Brunn.
"The hygiene conditions at the workplace and the living conditions in particular need to be strictly controlled from our point of view.
That obviously didn't happen. "
The outbreak came "with announcement".
Underground station Aidenbachstraße: Dangerous dispute: 19-year-old falls into the track bed after Schubser
In a dispute between two youth groups at the Aidenbachstraße underground station, a 19-year-old fell through a pusher and slipped into the track bed.
Obersendling - On Friday there was a quarrel between two youth groups at the Aidenbachstraße underground station at around 4.15 pm.
A passer-by alerted the police, who approached with several stripes.
According to the first investigation, a Munich (17) pushed a 19-year-old to the ground.
The young man slipped over the platform edge and fell into the track bed.
People from the group of the 17-year-old helped the fallen man to climb out of the track.
There was no danger of a train coming in.
As reported by the police, there were again clashes between the two people.
The 17-year-old initially fled the scene, but his personal belongings were subsequently investigated.
Accompanied by his father, he went to police inspection 29.
The 17-year-old is investigated for bodily harm.
Report: Seehofer urges longer data retention
Data retention is currently suspended.
According to a media report, Federal Minister of the Interior Horst Seehofer calls for an extension of the storage period.
He wants to strengthen the fight against child abuse.
According to a media report, Federal Minister of the Interior Horst Seehofer (CSU) calls for an extended data retention - instead of the planned ten weeks, half a year.
As reported in the "Bild am Sonntag", Seehofer asked Justice Minister Christine Lambrecht (SPD) in a letter for a quick change of the law.
Seehofer therefore wants to strengthen the measures against child abuse.
He believes it makes sense to "make urgently needed adjustments to the law already now," the newspaper quotes from the letter.
Data retention is currently suspended.
A decision of the ECJ is expected.
Seehofer, however, wants the changes beforehand so that they can be applied immediately after a possible positive judgment, the report continues.
A spokesman for the Ministry of Justice told the newspaper that it could only be reasonably examined whether legal adjustments were necessary if the courts had decided.
In the fight against child abuse and child pornography, Seehofer, together with the interior ministers of the countries, had already spoken out in June for data retention.
NBA: Stripclub hassle for clipper star Lou Williams
Excitement in the NBA!
Lou Williams (33), professional basketball player for the Los Angeles Clippers, is said to have left the tournament quarter in Disney World in Orlando / Florida with permission for a funeral.
According to US media reports, he visited the strip club "Magic City" in Atlanta in the evening.
Williams, who is said to have admitted the visit according to ESPN data, is again in isloation, is tested daily for COVID-19.
His reason for the visit: Chicken Wings.
In February last year, "Sweet Lou", as he is called in the NBA, has already expressed his love for exactly these Wings.
The American wrote: "Magic City and Blue Flame (another strip club in Atlanta, usually) have the best wings in town".
NBA insider Shams Charania announced on Twitter on Sunday that the NBA has put Williams in a ten-day quarantine.
Thus, the Clippers star missed the first two official games after the test game phase.
In Disney World, the NBA wants to end the Corona season.
Currently, the top 22 teams are preparing for the season finale starting on Friday night with training matches.
Söder expresses himself about the corona situation after mass infecton
Munich - Health Minister Melanie Huml (CSU) has already announced a test offensive for large farms on Sunday.
The press conference will be shown live on our homepage.
The case in Mamming in the district of Dingolfing-Landau has startled authorities and politicians.
Almost 500 crop workers from several countries are currently working on the large vegetable farm, more than a third of them have become infected with the corona pathogen.
The farm is now quarantined and closed with a construction fence.
No one is allowed to leave the site, food is delivered.
The authorities now offer free Corona tests to the more than 3,300 inhabitants of the municipality.
Since the harvest workers had little contact with the local population, the district office so far assumes that the infections have not spread beyond the farm.
"Conscience Bites": Confession of the alleged arsonist of Nantes
"My client was cooperative," lawyer Quentin Chabert told the newspaper.
The defender added, "He deeply regrets the deeds, the confession was for him a liberation."
His mandate was "plagued by bites of conscience and very taken away from the extent of destruction".
In the case of a conviction, according to the prosecutor's office, the man faces ten years imprisonment and a fine of 150,000 euros.
The Gothic St. Peter and Paul Cathedral in Nantes was badly damaged in a fire on Saturday night last week.
The fire broke out in three distant places in the church.
Laboratory tests confirmed the suspicion of arson.
The suspect had already been arrested a few hours after the fire.
He was released one day later.
The man works as a volunteer for the diocese of Nantes and was responsible for closing the cathedral on the eve of the fire.
Since there was no trace of a violent penetration into the church, he quickly became the focus of the investigators.
Discuss the abolition of the 50 + 1 rule
Former DFB President Reinhard Grindel has recommended thinking about abolishing the 50 + 1 rule.
"German football should at least discuss setting conditions and clear rules for investors before the EU Commission creates completed facts," Grindel said to the "Bild am Sonntag".
He stressed: "The 50 + 1 rules do not work for the clubs that are most likely to become dangerous in Bavaria and Dortmund: see Leipzig or Leverkusen.
In this respect, one cannot avoid the debate as to whether it is not necessary to facilitate the involvement of investors in associations that want to break into this phalanx ".
However, he has doubts as to whether there is a willingness in the German Football League to allow majority participation, which is prohibited in the Bundesliga by the 50 + 1 rule.
"It remains a legal risk to draw investment fences around the business location of the Bundesliga in a single European market," said Grindel.
The former head of the DFB sees the danger that "the attempts to ensure more competitive balance in the Bundesliga ultimately only weaken the competitiveness of our top clubs at the European level, but do not lead to more excitement in the championship".
Even an equal distribution of the TV funds will not achieve a decisive effect.
"FC Bayern has a turnover of 750 million euros, Borussia Dortmund 500 million and RB Leipzig 300 million.
The differences are therefore immense among the first three clubs alone.
The other 15 clubs have an average budget of 130 million, "said the 58-year-old.
Looking at the past, Grindel feels betrayed.
"Unfortunately, there have been people who noticed this mistake and pierced the press instead of addressing me," said Grindel about the adoption of an expensive watch that led to his resignation in April 2019.
"This has already been a human concern for me."
He received the gift of about 11,000 euros from a Ukrainian official.
"I have committed a compliance violation and it was right to draw the consequences from it," said Grindel.
"I used the ominous watch gift in a completely transparent and unsuspecting way.
Many in the DFB knew about it. "
He never "made a secret of the gift," assured the 58-year-old.
"That may be called naive, at least this form of transparency was the complete opposite of corruption."
"Black Lives Matter": injured and a dead man
The protests against police violence in the United States have been sharpened by Donald Trump's use of federal police in several cities.
On Saturday there were clashes between protesters and policemen in various cities.
Three people were injured in Louisville, and 16 people were arrested in Seattle.
In Austin, a person was killed by gunfire while a demonstration march was crossing a crossing.
Previously, protests against racism and police violence had once again led to clashes in Portland.
The security forces, including officials from the Federal Police, used tear gas on the night of Saturday and forcibly dispersed protesters.
Hundreds of protesters, some armed, marched through Louisville on Saturday in Kentucky, demanding that those responsible for the death of Breonna Taylor be held responsible.
The 26-year-old student was shot dead in a drug raid in her home in Louisville in March.
The target of the raid was someone else who did not live there at all, and no drugs were found.
On Saturday, when a member of a group calling itself an armed alliance of black Americans fired a shot, three people were injured.
According to the NBC, they were taken to the hospital.
None of them was in danger of life.
The police set up barricades because counter-demonstrators of a white militia had also formed.
In the end, there was no meeting between the two groups.
In Austin, Texas, a person was shot and killed in the course of a "Black Lives Matter" demonstration.
The police detained a suspect.
She has not yet provided any further information on the circumstances of the offence.
Mayor Steve Adler told the New York Times that he, like many in the city, was "inconsolable and stunned" about what had happened.
Also in the American metropolis of Seattle, protesters clashed with the police on Saturday.
They set fire to construction cars in front of a youth prison, and the police used iridescent grenades and pepper spray.
According to the Seattle Times, 16 people were arrested for resistance to police or bodily harm.
A court building was set on fire in the city of Oakland, California.
A small group of protesters hit windows, fired fireworks, and laser-dazzled police officers, the Oakland police reported late on Saturday evening (local time).
The fire was quickly extinguished.
In Aurora, a suburb of Denver, Colorado, a car drove through a crowd demonstrating on a highway.
According to the police, one of the protesters fired a weapon and at least one person was injured in the hospital.
There were also windows in a court and a fire was set, as reported by the police.
Investigations were started.
Rakoczy in Bad Kissingen: Historical costumes defy Corona
Although the big snack was missing in the spa town, visitors and performers enjoyed the Rakoczy flair of the alternative program.
It was unusual for visitors, performers and organizers: the Rakoczy weekend without a Rakoczy festival.
But: Even if the big party mile was missing in the city center, the crowds and program highlights like Saale is burning, Rakoczy-Ball or the parade, many got their money's worth with the Corona-compliant alternative program.
"I think we have succeeded in spreading Rakoczy flair," says spa director Sylvie Thormann.
The guests would have accepted it well.
In principle, one returns to the beginnings of the Rakoczy festival, as the historical ones were also the focus of the festival.
Pleasant atmosphere
Vesna Konhäuser has always visited with her husband for more than 25 years at the Rakoczy-Fest Bad Kissingen.
Also this time in the Corona year.
The couple have made themselves comfortable at the Luitpold Casino, watching the history while strolling and listening to the Cuban live music at the casino restaurant.
"I also find it so pleasant," says Konhäuser.
It does not miss the crowds that are otherwise part of Rakoczy.
But you miss the usual programme highlights, especially Saale on Friday night and the historic parade and fireworks display on Sunday night.
"That's a pity.
The weather would have been great this year, "she says.
Rakoczy equestrian tournament to take place again
For the performers of the historic spa guests, the alternative program meant more work.
For example, Christina Gold, who participates in the parade in a normal year and can be seen there on the carriage of the Kurgarten cafe.
This year she was walking in costume on Saturdays and Sundays in the city.
"That's more strenuous, otherwise we'll have it easier," she says.
The equestrian club had less to do, even though individual riders were traveling in the park.
"We very much hope that the equestrian quadrille will be able to take place again next year," says Ulrike Waldhofen.
She announced that after a break of several years in 2021, another Rakoczy equestrian tournament will take place.
28 Corona cases with Spanish second-division club Fuenlabrada
The Spanish second division football club CF Fuenlabrada is sliding deeper into the crisis due to a Corona outbreak.
Since the newcomer from near Madrid had flown to a match in the city of A Coruña on July 20, despite the first Corona cases, a low impact follows the next.
Until Sunday 28 players or team members had been tested positive, one of them came to the hospital, as the club reported.
Fuenlabrada from the city of the same name southwest of Madrid had the chance to reach the promotion playoffs.
Now even the descent into the B-Group of the Second League is threatening.
The match against Deportivo La Coruña last Monday was cancelled at the last moment, the prosecutor's office investigated for a possible offence against public health, the top sports authority CSD is considering the forced descent of the club.
Players and other team members are quarantined in a hotel.
"Until the sixth day of quarantine, they did not get a fresh towel and gel," wrote the sports newspaper "AS".
On photos, players can be seen hanging underwear and club clothes in their rooms in the hotel for drying after they apparently had to wash them themselves.
Also, the bedding was not changed for five days.
Another problem is the food.
Neither good nor sufficient, "AS" wrote.
However, the club announced that they were satisfied with the hotel.
The club's attorney, Javier Tebas Llanas, rejected the accusation of deliberately endangering public health.
The son of the president of the Spanish Primera Division, Javier Tebas, as reported by the news agency Europa Press and the sports newspaper "Marca", did not violate the Corona rules set up by the Football Association.
Before the flight, there were four infected people until 19 July, but they were all isolated and had not travelled with them.
Just before the flight on Monday to A Coruña, all players and team members were tested again.
When the team was already in A Coruña, the corona test was positive for "five or six" other team members.
The game was cancelled 60 minutes before the kick-off, Tebas Llanas said.
Police must catch horses torn out of steam compartment
Two animals were on the road.
The police took her back to her owner.
On Sunday morning, just before 6 o'clock, a road user reported two free-running horses on the feeder between the junction Donnersdorf / Steinsfeld and the motorway junction Theres.
At the arrival of the officers, the horses were already between the feeder and the village of Dampfach.
Shortly before the steam-compartment could be won by the officials the confidence of the horses, these each had a rope carried in the strip-wagon.
Radprofi Tony Martin: Career continuation imaginable
Time trial specialist Tony Martin is thinking about continuing his career.
Frankfurt / Main - The seven-time time trial world champion Tony Martin can well imagine to continue his cycling career.
"I am currently setting the conditions with the team, how and in which form it could continue," said the 35-year-old of the "Frankfurter Allgemeine Sonntagszeitung".
Martin is currently employed by the Dutch team Jumbo-Visma and had considered ending his career this year before the Corona break.
The negotiations with his team are also about the number of race days, he said.
Or about other problems that would plague him as a family father, said Martin.
He used to stand up after a fall, and the first thought was: "Quickly return to the wheel.
Today, as the father of a little daughter, I think: what if ".
The professional cyclist admitted that there are aspects with which he is increasingly difficult.
"But it was good for me to remember from the Corona time what I got from cycling and how much fun it is for me".
The time trial specialist returns to competition at the Tour de l'Ain (5 to 9 August).
Bavaria: At least four dead on Bavaria's streets at the weekend
The beautiful weather attracts bikers on the streets in many places.
For at least three people, the motorcycle tour ends deadly.
An 18-year-old pedestrian also dies.
Schönthal - In accidents on Bavaria's streets, several, mostly young people died on the weekend.
An 18-year-old motorcyclist was caught on Saturday near Schönthal (Cham district) by a car, which came on the opposite track.
At first, it was unclear why the car was on the opposite track.
On Saturday, in Upper Bavaria, a 22-year-old collided with a horse carriage on his machine.
He was walking downhill at Beilngries, according to the police.
In a left turn, he bounced against the carriage.
His injuries were so severe that he died at the scene of the accident.
Of the twelve passengers on the carriage, one man was severely injured and one man was slightly injured, as reported by the police.
In another fatal accident, an 18-year-old died in Bad Kötzting, Upper Palatinate.
He had laid down on a road on Sunday night and was overrun by a 42-year-old driver.
According to the police, the 18-year-old wanted to sleep.
The driver could no longer brake in time.
At Schönberg (district of Freyung-Grafenau) on Saturday, a 57 year old biker collided frontally against a car in a right-hand bend despite full braking.
He died in the accident.
The 57-year-old driver suffered a shock, the other three people in the car remained uninjured.
The safety of motorcyclists was discussed on Saturday by Bavaria's Minister of Transport Kerstin Schreyer (CSU).
In a letter to the organiser of the biker protests announced for August against driving bans, Gabor Kovacs, the Minister referred to extensive investments such as underride protection at guardrails and the defusing of dangerous curves.
"For the safety of motorcyclists, we have achieved a lot in recent years," the letter said.
"The number of motorized two-wheelers killed decreased by around 28 percent compared to 2011."
Kovac tests with Monaco against Frankfurt
Frankfurt / Main (dpa) - With his new club AS Monaco, football coach Niko Kovac will soon have a reunion with Eintracht Frankfurt.
The eight-time French champion will perform on 1 August (6 p.m.) at the Hessen, the former club of the Croat.
For the Bundesliga, it is the first and only endurance test before the return match in the Europa League against FC Basel (6 August).
Because of the coronavirus pandemic, the encounter is held without spectators.
"We are especially looking forward to this game.
It is always nice to come to Frankfurt and meet friends, "explained Kovac.
This is an interesting test in terms of sport, said the 48-year-old.
Before joining FC Bayern Munich, Kovac had coached the Hessen from 2016 to 2018 and led to the victory in the DFB-Pokal.
"A top-class opponent like Monaco is a good test for us with regard to the match against Basel.
Like all the people in Frankfurt, I look forward to meeting Niko Kovac again, "said Eintracht coach Adi Hütter.
The 50-year-old Austrian had succeeded the Croat in the Concord.
In March, the Frankfurt side lost the first round of the eighth round against Basel in their own stadium with a 0 – 3 loss.
Almost 50 new infections: Landkreis Hof just past the lockdown
In the district of Hof, the number of known corona-new infections has increased further on the weekend: from 39 on Friday and 43 on Saturday (one person has recovered and no longer falls into these statistics) to 47 on Sunday.
In addition, there is a case in the city courtyard.
This means that the Hof space is approaching the critical mark of 50 new infections per 100,000 inhabitants in a week.
700 deaths from monsoon rain in Southeast Asia
More than 9 million people are affected by the severe floods in Southeast Asia, especially in Bangladesh, India and Nepal.
Due to the heavy monsoon rainfall, a total of 700 people were killed.
In Bangladesh, the Red Crescent tries to reach isolated people in boats.
Whole villages are under water.
The farmers have lost their harvests.
Tank rhinos in National Park die by landslides
In the Kaziranga National Park, several of the 120 tank rhinos died from landslides.
They are protected and considered endangered by extinction.
This year, the floods are particularly bad, which scientists attribute to climate change.
According to the United Nations, Bangladesh is one of the countries most affected by global warming.
New apartments are empty
In the town of Cox's Bazar in the south of Bangladesh, the state has built apartments for 650 displaced persons by the floods.
So far only a few have moved in.
It is difficult to bring people to Cox's Bazar.
The enthusiasm is also held in Grenezn.
Anyone who used to have a house, it was also so small and like a hut, often does not want to spend his life in a large apartment block.
Many apartments are empty, but - as the government wants to do - they will soon be occupied by those who have lost their homes due to the floods.
60 Corona new infections in just one day in Vienna
In a 24-hour comparison, 60 corona new infections were reported in Vienna - in Lower Austria there were 22 new infections.
The Landessanitätsdirektion Wien and the medical crisis team of the city of Vienna regularly inform about the current case numbers and other key figures for the COVID-19 virus: As of Sunday, 26 July 2020, 8.00 o'clock, 4,840 (+ 60) positive tests are confirmed in Vienna.
The number of deaths associated with the virus remains unchanged at 204.
4,090 (+ 48) persons are recovered.
22 new coronavirus infections in Lower Austria
The number of coronavirus infections in Lower Austria has increased by 22 on Sunday to 3,288.
According to the medical staff, a patient has recovered.
This increases the number of recoveries to 2,936.
There were currently 247 patients suffering from COVID-19 in the state.
So far, 147,253 tests have been carried out.
105 people died in connection with lung disease.
Argentina rejects counter-offer of creditors
The new demands could not be met, the Ministry of Economy in Buenos Aires announced on Saturday.
"This would not only be irresponsible, but also unjust," said a statement.
"While 50 percent of children in Argentina live in poverty, we cannot increase the short-term profits of our creditors."
The debts of the second largest economy in South America are no longer viable under current conditions.
This is why Argentina is asking its private creditors to waive some of their claims of around USD 66 billion (around EUR 59 billion).
If no agreement is reached, the country will again face state bankruptcy.
It would be the ninth payment default in Argentine history.
Most recently, lenders had demanded higher interest rates on government bonds and changes to some contractual clauses.
However, the Argentine government maintains its last offer and is not prepared to make any further concessions.
Argentina is in a serious financial and economic crisis.
Most recently, the inflation rate was more than 50 percent.
Experts expect economic power to decline by around ten percent in the current year.
At the end of May, Argentina had not settled interest receivables amounting to 503 million US dollars and had thus slipped into a limited default.
Professionally arrived - private not yet
Dr. Stefanie Kramer draws this conclusion after her first days at the notary's office in Eggenfelden.
In the end, everything went very fast: In the middle of May, Dr. Stefanie Kramer learned that she will succeed Lutz Feller in the Eggenfelden notarial office.
Already six weeks later, at the beginning of July, the doctoral lawyer took up the work, the normal day-to-day business is already in full swing.
"However, I still have to arrive privately," she explains in conversation with the Rottaler Anzeiger and laughs.
The short lead time did not suffice, of course, to shift the center of life from Regensburg completely to Eggenfelden, reports the native Dingolfinger.
She is currently looking for a suitable apartment or house in the city with her husband, who works as a judge at the district court in Regensburg.
At least her husband was still able to apply for parental leave at short notice in order to ensure the care of the two daughters (3 ½ and 1 ½ years old).
In order not to have to commute every day from Regensburg, she also has an overnight stay with her parents in Dingolfing, explains the 39-year-old.
Grown up in the neighboring district, the town of Eggenfelden has of course long been known to it.
During visits with her family in recent months, she has then again stated: "Eggenfelden is a really beautiful small town".
She was all the more pleased that she had made the race in the selection process for the vacancy.
Also in Dr. Stefanie Kramer's professional career, her home of Lower Bavaria plays a central role: After studying law in Passau, she completed her internship and the 2nd state examination in Regensburg.
After several positions as a notary assessor, among others in Rehau and Hof in Upper Franconia, Babenhausen in the Unterallgäu and Regensburg - during this time she also shouldered her doctorate in labour law - she took her first position as a notary in Rotthalmünster in the district of Passau in 2012.
In 2016, she was on parental leave and then moved to Regensburg.
Since then, he has served in various notarial offices.
When the job in Eggenfelden was advertised because of the approaching retirement of Lutz Feller, she saw the right time for the full professional return, explains the 39-year-old.
The team of its predecessor, who in the future takes over the holiday representation in the notarial office, Dr. Stefanie Kramer completely took over - and has immediately a praise for the team of the law firm ready: "It is going very well!"
The fact that she can rely on well-established processes makes it easier for her to take care of the pending relocation of the private centre of gravity.
In terms of nursery and nursery places, she has already contacted a local institution.
And if everything works out as desired, she hopes to pursue her hobby here too soon - and to get to know the most beautiful jogging routes of the Rottal.
BVB plans for league start with a maximum of 15,000 spectators
Dortmund The largest German football stadium in Dortmund will not be filled to 20 percent at the start of the season in case of a fan return.
"Due to the distance regulation, which must be compelled to be complied with, we plan to have 12,000 to 15,000 spectators at present," Borussia Dortmund's managing director Carsten Cramer said to the "Tagesspiegel".
Usually the arena in the district city holds a little more than 81,000 spectators at Bundesliga matches.
The BVB lost about four million euros per game in the ghost games caused by the Corona pandemic last season.
The Cramer, who is responsible for marketing, digitalization and internationalization at the BVB, hopes that, in addition to the normal spectator seats, some of the approximately 4000 seats in the hospitality sector can be opened again: "It is of course a blow to the office if these revenues completely break away".
In view of the ongoing Corona crisis, everyone is currently "well advised to take a stable sideline first".
"If many companies are not doing well and 6.8 million people are in short-time work in Germany alone, then the need is limited to entertainment," said Cramer.
The Dortmund marketing boss praised the BVB pros for their salary partial waiver, which is intended to help overcome the crisis: "Of course, players know that their salary waiver has a different effect than when we put 100 people working in merchandising on short-time work."
Tiny wonders: early start to life with a few hundred grams
Barely heavier than a packer of butter, just three tablespoons of blood in his entire body: that was Gabriel when he was born - he weighed exactly 273 grams.
The Bub is one of about 400 premature babies that are taken care of at the Grazer Kinderklinik every year.
A quarter of them weighs less than 1,500 grams, a few - like Gabriel and his brothers Raphael and Michael - are extreme lightweight with less than a kilogram of birth weight.
They are so small and so early that neither lungs, nor intestines, nor muscles are fully developed.
Sometimes your skin is so delicate that it could hurt the electrodes of an ECG.
And they are so tiny that they sometimes wear doll clothes and mini diapers specially made for them.
But not so small that they are not in the voice - "and how", Berndt Urlesberger smiles.
"Even if, of course, they don't shout as loud as big babies."
When the whiteboard becomes the stage
Despite Corona Theater in the classroom: The Whiteboard as a stage experienced the 9th classes of the St. Jakobus-Gymnasium in Abtsgmünd shortly before the start of the holiday.
Actress Julia Sylvester from the Theater der Stadt Aalen presented the production "Das Heimatkleid" to the pupils - by video.
The students were then able to talk to the actress and director Winfried Tobias via Skype about the play and the performance.
The idea for the performance format from the current Corona situation had been born.
Teacher Teresa Nar was happy about the enrichment of the lessons.
Even if at the end all participants agreed that the direct encounter in the theater and stage space would offer additional stimuli, one sees in the theater also the potentials for the contact in the schools.
"If we continue to improve the technical framework, this could be an interesting addition to the game," emphasized director Winfried Tobias.
First round draw: TSV 1860 would face Eintracht Frankfurt in the DFB-Pokal
Should the TSV 1860 qualify for the DFB-Pokal, the lions will face Eintracht Frankfurt in the first round.
This resulted in the draw on Sunday.
Munich - Sixty possible opponents in the first round of the DFB-Pokal are fixed.
The lions would meet Eintracht Frankfurt in a successful qualification.
This resulted in the draw on Sunday evening in the ARD Sports Show.
Because of the Corona pandemic, the field of participants is not yet complete, placeholders were used in the draw.
Due to the voluntary renunciation of semi-final opponents FC Memmingen, TSV 1860 is already in the final of the Bavarian Toto Cup (4 or 5 September).
There, the lions meet either the Würzburg Kickers or Viktoria Aschaffenburg.
Should second-tier club Würzburg reach the final, sixty would already be qualified for the first round in the DFB-Pokal.
Otherwise, the Giesinger would have to prevail in the final against Regionalligist Aschaffenburg.
The first round of the DFB Cup is held between 11 and 14 September, one week before the start of the third division.
"Gone with the Wind": Film legend Olivia de Havilland is dead
The film legend and Oscar winner Olivia de Havilland is dead.
She died on Sunday in Paris at the age of 104 of a natural death, confirmed her spokeswoman for the German press agency.
De Havilland was known for her role as Melanie Hamilton in the southern epic "Vom Winde beweht" (1939).
Born to British parents in Tokyo, Olivia de Havilland moved to California as an infant.
The Austrian theatre man Max Reinhardt discovered the 19-year-old in the role of Hermia of Shakespeare's "Midsummer Night's Dream".
The film studio Warner Brothers signed her for seven years and released her at the side of Eroll Flynn.
She made eight films with the heartbreaker.
In 1946 she won her first Oscar in the leading role of "To Each His Own".
The film was screened in Germany under the title "Mother's Heart".
Three years later, the award came as the best actress in William Wylers "The Heiress".
She also received much recognition as a neurotic eccentric in "Der dunkle Spiegel" and "Die Schlangengrube".
Daphne du Maurier suggested her in 1952 for the lead role in the film adaptation of her novel "My Cousin Rachel".
The play became a worldwide success.
With her longtime girlfriend Bette Davis she played in "Wiegenlied für eine Leiche".
The son Benjamin was born from his marriage to the writer Marcus Goodrich (1946 to 1953).
In Paris, de Havilland married the journalist Pierre Paul Galante and had his daughter Gisèle with him.
This marriage also broke up.
However, rumors of an affair with former British Prime Minister Edward Heath were never confirmed.
"Road to Timmendorf": Beach volleyball: Thole / Wickler miss Final at Comeback
Julius Thole and Clemens Wickler missed the final at the beach volleyball tournament "Road to Timmendorf".
At the meeting of the top teams in Düsseldorf, they lost 1: 2 (17: 21, 21: 17, 19: 21) to their national team colleagues Nils Ehlers and Lars Flüggen in the semifinals.
Last Thole / Wickler had played in September of last year at the World Tour Final in Rome.
In the final on the Rhine, their conquerors Ehlers / Flüggen beat the surprise team Lukas Pfretschner and his interim partner Steven van de Velde by a defeat of 0: 2 (17: 21, 17: 21).
In addition to the show tournament, three starting places for the German championships were played at the beginning of September in Timmendorfer Strand: The tickets were secured by Armin Dollinger / Simon Kulzer, Manuel Harms / Richard Peemüller and Simon Pfretschner / Milan Sievers.
Veal ejection from AfD confirmed - FDP speaks of "fig leaf"
From the point of view of the FDP, the exclusion of Andreas Kalbitz from the AfD is only a "fig leaf" and does not change the character of the party.
"The AfD is the parliamentary arm of the right-wing extremists in Germany.
Andreas Kalbitz is only part of the tip of the iceberg of the radicals in the AfD, "said the FDP interior politician Benjamin Strasser of the news agency dpa in Berlin.
The Federal Court of Arbitration of the AfD had confirmed on Saturday in Stuttgart after several hours of trial the exclusion of Kalbitz, which the Federal Executive Board had decided by majority in May.
Kalbitz is chairman of the AfD faction in the Brandenburger Landtag.
"If the AfD really wanted to consistently remove right-wing extremists from their party, functionaries like Björn Höcke and his supporters would have long since been excluded," Strasser said.
"However, there is no political will in the AfD because right-wing extremism is now part of the party."
CSU General Secretary Markus Blume said similarly: "That Andreas Kalbitz is now excluded says nothing and does not change anything," he said to the "Welt am Sonntag".
"Rather, it speaks volumes, how many frenetic supporters a right-wing extremist in the middle of the AfD still has".
Blume assumes that the AfD will again fall below five percent in future elections.
"The days of the AfD in the parliaments are counted".
Kalbitz was one of the spokesmen of the officially dissolved "wing" around the Thuringian AfD state and faction chairman Björn Höcke; the constitutional protection classifies the tinge as "assured right-wing extremist aspiration".
In May, the AfD-Bundesvorstand had thrown Kalbitz out of the party.
As a result, he stated that Kalbitz had not stated an earlier membership in the now forbidden far-right "Heimattreuen Deutschen Jugend" (HDJ) and among the Republicans.
Kalbitz denies membership in the HDJ.
The chairman of the Left faction in the Brandenburg state parliament, Sebastian Walter, also stressed that the decision of the Federal Arbitration Court does not change the character of the AfD: "The wolf has only eaten chalk.
The AfD remains a far-right party, whether with or without Kalbitz ".
Neither the federal party nor the right wing will be weakened with this decision.
"The maneuver of the Meuthen troop is transparent.
One wants to avoid further observation by the protection of the constitution and tries to get through under the radar ", said Walter.
"The AfD does not get rid of the ghosts it called.
An ejection does not change anything, "said Erik Stohn, SPD general secretary in Brandenburg, commenting on the decision in the Kalbitz case.
"Here the AfD-Landesverband and the faction kept to their right leader".
The legal dispute over Kalbitz's membership in the AfD will continue.
He announced on Saturday that he would now proceed with civil law against the decision of the Federal Arbitration Court.
North Sea wind farms supply a good 21 percent more electricity
In the first six months of the year, the wind turbines on the German North Sea fed 11.51 terawatt hours of electricity into the grid.
This is a good 21 percent more than in the same period of the previous year, announced the grid operator Tennet in Bayreuth.
Tennet is responsible for the transmission of the North Sea electricity to the mainland and the transmission through the German electricity grid.
The wind turbines on the Baltic Sea, which do not belong to the grid area of Tennet, have fed a further 2.22 terawatt-hours (TWh) of electricity.
Overall, wind power from the North Sea and the Baltic Sea thus reaches 13.73 TWh, compared to a good 11.64 TWh in the first half of 2019.
The wind harvest at sea thus accounts for almost 19 percent of the total wind power in Germany, which is about four percentage points more than a year ago.
New wind farms ensure higher generation capacities
In addition to the wind conditions, the increased contribution of offshore wind energy results from higher generation capacities, because new wind farms have been connected to the grid in the last twelve months.
If the 1270 wind power plants in the North Sea all run at full power at the same time, they could generate 6.7 gigawatts of electricity.
The transmission capacity is sufficient; according to Tennet, it is 7.1 gigawatts.
By 2030, it is expected to rise to 17 gigawatts in the German North Sea.
"In Germany and the Netherlands, we are investing 20 billion euros in the expansion of offshore grid connections," said TENT Managing Director Tim Meyerjürgens.
In reality, even at sea, wind farms cannot exploit their capacity, but reach about 40 percent.
The record day so far this year is 2 January, when the North Sea wind farms generated more than six gigawatts of electricity.
On average, the North Sea wind turbines produce about 2.5 to 3.0 gigawatts of electricity, which corresponds to three to four nuclear power plants.
This could supply almost seven million households with electricity.
Art "Skirmish" - an exhibition of the Leipzig artist Christian Bold in the gallery of the Gmünder Kunstverein.
This was almost a small anniversary celebration for the 130.
Birthday of the Gmünder Kunstverein: The exhibition opening "Skirmish" with works by the Leipzig artist Christian Bold blew up the usual frame after the Corona break.
Many more art friends than usual pursued the dialogue between the artist and the chairman of the Kunstverein, Professor Dr. Klaus Ripper.
The musical equivalent was provided by the band "Defenders of the Universe" on the southern Kornhausplatz.
To the north of the gallery was the association "Sandtogether".
Freital: Windbergfest cancelled because of Corona
The Windbergfest does not take place this year.
The city of Freital cancelled the three-day festival planned in September.
In other years, more than 30,000 people had attended this city festival.
"We really didn't make this decision easy and - aware of how difficult it is for the parties involved - hoped to reach the last minute," said Lord Mayor Uwe Rumberg (non-partisan).
"But ultimately, we are responsible for the health of many thousands of people here as organisers."
Because if tens of thousands had flowed into the grounds and into the marquee, minimum distances, hygiene regulations and contact tracking according to the current Corona protection regulation could not have been complied with.
Or the restrictions would have been so strong that there was not much left of a folk festival.
Moreover, the organisation and monitoring effort would increase disproportionately.
Rumberg rested for next year.
Then the city of Freital celebrates its 100th anniversary with the Winterberg Festival from 7 to 9 May 2021 and the Day of Saxony from 10 to 12 September 2021.
Dressage Olympic Champion Werth in Achleiten not to beat
Achleiten - Six times Olympic champion Isabell Werth was the outstanding rider at the dressage tournament in Achleiten, Austria.
The 51-year-old from Rheinberg came on the weekend with four starts to four victories.
After winning a Grand Prix with Weihegold and Quantaz, she was also unable to beat on Sunday in the Grand Prix Special and in the freestyle.
On the 15-year-old mare Weihegold, Werth won the Special on Sunday against the Austrian Victoria Max-Theurer on Abegglen.
Even in the freestyle, the Germans were clearly ahead of their 34 year old student Victoria Max-Theurer on Quantaz on Saturday.
Werth's winning horse Quantaz belongs to Max-Theurer.
The most successful dressage rider in the world should establish the ten-year-old stallion in the Grand Prix.
For Quantaz it was the first freestyle ever.
At the first tournament in Achleiten three weeks ago, Werth had already won all the important four tests.
The last of the three international tournaments is scheduled for 14 to 16 August.
More air traffic controllers in Worms in the future
The University of Worms continues to go into the air: "DFS Deutsche Flugsicherung" donates a professorship for "Air Traffic Management".
A corresponding contract between the university and DFS has now been signed in Worms.
The contract was initially concluded for three years and will start in 2021.
With the professorship, it is possible to start studying not only in the summer semester, but also in the winter semester.
This means that twice as many students can be trained as before.
At the same time, the capacities of both the university and the DFS Air Traffic Control Academy are equally utilized.
DFS will advise the university in setting up and filling the professorship.
Since 2019 represented at the university
Since the summer semester 2019, the first students in the course of their training as air traffic controllers at the University of Applied Sciences Worms are in the study program Air Traffic Management.
This year, nine students have already started.
So far, the experiences of DFS have been very positive, the students' achievements are excellent.
The combination of studies and pilot training contributes significantly to further increasing the attractiveness of the pilot's profession.
"In these times, promotion is not easy for us economically.
However, we expect air traffic to recover and grow again in the long term.
In order to continue to fulfil our legal mandate in the future, we need highly qualified personnel, "says Professor Klaus-Dieter Scheurle, Chairman of DFS when signing the contract.
"For DFS, the endowed professorship is a future-proof investment that will provide air traffic controllers with a broad, interdisciplinary knowledge base in the long term.
We therefore continue the good cooperation with the university and at the same time underpin our attractiveness as an employer ".
This is underlined by Professor Dr. Jens Hermsdorf, President of the University of Applied Sciences Worms: "The endowed professorship forms an important bridge between science and business.
With it, we would like to build on the existing cooperation with DFS Deutsche Flugsicherung as a practical partner for the dual bachelor's program Air Traffic Management. "
The trust of the German Air Traffic Control Agency is both a motivation and an obligation for the University of Applied Sciences Worms to further expand its teaching and research expertise in the fields of future aviation.
With the first endowed professorship for a dual degree program, the university can set very special highlights and innovative priorities for its students in its commitment to tomorrow's air traffic controllers.
Dr. Denis Alt, State Secretary at the Ministry of Science, Continuing Education and Culture, emphasizes: "Worms University of Applied Sciences has a unique selling point in the field of air transport in Rhineland-Palatinate.
Today's signing of the cooperation agreement strengthens the profile of the university ".
Rescue helicopter lands on the A 45
Around 30 minutes the A 45 motorway was fully closed on Saturday afternoon towards Aschaffenburg, because after a traffic accident the rescue helicopter was in use.
A 76-year-old drove with a Ford at 12.40 in the exit Alzenau-Mitte in the curve straight ahead and landed at the guardrail.
Due to the impact, the front airbags triggered, the driver suffered minor injuries on the face and had to be taken to a hospital for treatment.
The wounds of the 72-year-old passenger were treated by the emergency doctor and the patient was subsequently flown to a hospital by the rescue helicopter.
At present, however, the police assume that there is no danger of life.
The damaged vehicle, which caused damage of about 2000 euros, had to be towed.
Heil wants to test other industries after meat industry
The Corona crisis brought the conditions in parts of the meat industry to light again.
Legislative tightenings are imminent.
But are they right - and will it continue?
Federal Minister of Labour Hubertus Heil (SPD) wants to check other sectors in accordance with the now planned strict regulations against maladministration in the meat industry.
"We will look at industry for industry and then take appropriate measures for the respective industry if it is necessary," Heil told the German Press Agency in Berlin.
Germany ’ s employers are already warning against restricting work contracts in general.
After the mass corona outbreak at the meat giant Tönnies in North Rhine-Westphalia, the federal cabinet wants to pass a law of salvation this Wednesday.
Large slaughterhouses should no longer be allowed to use foreign personnel in slaughter, dismantling and meat processing.
For this purpose, the use of contract workers and temporary workers is to be prohibited there.
Employer President Ingo Kramer said the dpa: "Finger away from a general restriction of work contracts and workers' surrender if one does not want to completely strangle the economy".
Work contracts are, for example, the basis for their value-added at the customer for a wide range of craft, the construction industry and plant construction.
"The misdemeanours of individuals cannot destroy such an important instrument".
Heil assured: "My goal is not to ban work contracts everywhere in the German economy."
Work contracts are useful.
"When an industrial operator orders a craftsman to install a safety system, it is a normal contract of work".
The German meat industry considers a ban on work contracts and temporary agency work to be unconstitutional in its sector alone.
It is unexplainable why in the future, when portioning and packaging cheese, different labour law should apply to sausage, according to a statement on the bill, as the "Neue Osnabrücker Zeitung" (Saturday) reports.
Under a ban, the consumer price would therefore increase by 10 to 20 percent per kilo and product.
Many Eastern European employees from contracting companies worked in the sector for 16 hours a day after the results of an audit of the NRW Occupational Safety and Health Administration.
They often had no break.
Wages were retained for protective equipment or rent.
It was also noted that the situation in the accommodation of workers was often miserable.
Heil said that a relatively sharp law had already come into force for the meat industry in 2017.
However, these were circumvented by "tricky constructions".
"Now we have to clean up fundamentally".
The politician announced: "In the occupational health and safety law, which we want to pass in the cabinet at the end of July, measures are also measures that not only affect the meat industry - for example, higher occupational health and safety test rates or clear criteria for community accommodation."
The draft presented to dpa includes amendments to the Act on the Protection of Workers' Rights in the Meat Industry and to the Occupational Safety and Health Act.
Brandenburg's Minister of Consumer Protection Ursula Nonnemacher (Green Party) considers more intensive controls necessary.
"I would like us to be able to make even more controls in many supervisory areas: food control, animal welfare, everything possible, including animal transport," said Nonnemacher on Sunday in the RBB broadcast "Brandenburg aktuell".
But more personnel positions are also needed for more controls.
Three dead in the crash of ultralight aircraft in Germany
According to the police, three people died in the crash of an ultralight aircraft on an apartment building in Wesel in the German state of North Rhine-Westphalia.
One child was slightly injured.
A spokesman for the Wesel district administration said that two other people had been saved in the accident.
A parachute was found at the accident site, according to the police.
The "Rheinische Post" reported, citing eyewitnesses, that the plane had collided with a hot air balloon before the crash.
The house is a single-family or two-family house.
Further details were not initially known.
The eviction of Frankfurt Opera Square is peaceful
One week after the riots in Frankfurt, the evacuation of the Opera Square on Sunday was peaceful.
Finally, a few dozen people stayed in the square, but left him before the start of the curfew at 1 o'clock.
The police had been in action with numerous officials since the early evening, and a larger police force was to be seen throughout the city.
For the first time this weekend from midnight onwards, an entry ban was applied for the Opera Square, where riots had occurred a week ago.
Police officers were attacked with bottles out of the crowd.
At least five officers were injured after police submissions, and several police vehicles were damaged.
The night to Saturday was also quiet.
Car overturns: Young woman seriously injured in an accident on Bundesstraße 83 at Hofgeismar
In an accident between Schöneberg and Hümme, a 21-year-old suffered serious injuries at around 1.25 p.m. on Sunday.
She was taken to the Kassel Clinic.
The fire brigade used thermal cameras to search for potential passengers.
According to the police, the woman was on the road 83 towards her place of residence Hümme on the way, when her car came off the road for reasons that had not yet been clarified and overturned several times.
In order to save the victims, the fire brigade had to cut the roof of the car.
Since it was unclear whether someone was still in the vehicle, the adjacent maize field was searched from the rotary ladder with a thermal imager.
The Drohnenstaffel from Warburg, which also works with thermal imaging cameras, had also been ordered for the search for people.
However, the volunteers did not find anyone between the high corn plants.
The severely injured was taken to the hospital in Kassel with the ambulance for further care.
Almost 50 volunteers from the Hofgeismar, Hümme and Schöneberg fire brigades were present.
The highway was closed for two hours due to the accident.
Juventus Turin Champion in Italy
Turin - After a redeeming goal by Cristiano Ronaldo, record champion Juventus Turin has secured the Italian championship for the ninth time in series.
The team around the five-time world footballer made the 36th Scudetto in club history perfect with a 2: 0 (1: 0) on Sunday night in the home match against Sampdoria Genoa.
Ronaldo scored 1 – 0 in the first half.
With 83 points, Turin, who competed without the last long-injured former international Sami Khedira, is no longer out of place one two matchdays before the end of the season of Serie A.
Inter Milan is seven points behind.
Juventus was harmless in the first half despite optical superiority, then Ronaldo hit after a free kick variant with the last action.
A match by Miralem Pjanic directly exploited the 35-year-old from the penalty space limit with a flat shot (45. + 7).
Ronaldo also took part in the 2: 0 against the now more offensive guests, after his shot Federico Bernardeschi dusted off (67.).
This was the perfect but decisive success.
The foul elfmeter shot to the bar in the 89th minute is probably only Ronaldo himself with regard to the goal hunter-scoring.
"It's complicated to stay at ball height mentally and physically for 90 minutes.
The games are weird, and momentum is changing very slightly, "said coach Maurizio Sarri after a 1 – 2 win at Udinese Calcio on Thursday.
Especially the mental exhaustion of his players is great, said the Juve-Coach.
Because of the defeat, the Turiners had not yet been able to make the championship perfect.
In the end, Juve had to owe the reassuring advantage at the top of the table to the weakness of the competitors.
Because in the eleven games before the game on Sunday, the Sarri-team only managed five victories.
Whether Ronaldo also becomes the goalscorer king is questionable.
While the Portuguese superstar has scored 31 goals so far, the former Ciro Immobile from Dortmund has already scored 34 goals in his account at Hellas Verona in the 5: 1 (1: 1) of Lazio Rome - as many as Robert Lewandowski contributed to the title win of FC Bayern.
The current Juve professional Gonzalo Higuaín holds the record in Italy.
In the 2015 / 2016 season the Argentine scored 36 goals for the SSC Naples.
The next title chance awaits the "old lady" of Italian football in August.
Juventus is in the eighth final of the Champions League, but on 7 August they have to make up for a 0: 1 first leg defeat to Olympique Lyon in order to reach the final tournament in Lisbon.
In the next knockout round, Real Madrid or Manchester City would wait as opponents.
Baden-Württemberg: Over 250 illegal car races recorded
Stuttgart - Despite all the punishments and court judgments threatened, motorists continue to gas in countless illegal races on Baden-Württemberg's roads: last year and the first four months of this year, police in the southwest have already registered more than 250 illegal car races.
Comparative figures for the years before do not exist, but the racers are increasingly doing work for the judicial authorities: In 2018, a total of 155 investigations were conducted with the prosecutors between Konstanz and Mannheim for illegal races, one year later there were already 252 and in the current year to the beginning of June 151.
The races were less about organized events, as can be seen from the response of the Ministry of the Interior to a request from the Landtag SPD.
In most cases, the drivers are spontaneously competing against each other or they have taken flight from the police - this is also reported as an illegal race.
German men aged between 18 and 60 were mainly at the wheel.
113 fines - 15 times imprisonment
Only in comparatively few cases are the racers caught and also asked to pay: According to the Ministry of the Interior, since 2018 a total of 113 fines have been imposed and 15 prison sentences pronounced.
However, there is no evidence that the number of illegal car races actually increases.
Rather, other drivers reacted more sensitively than they did in the past due to the many tragic accidents and processes, and reported more frequently, said a minister spokesman.
The freeway 8 is particularly popular with racers. Time and again, motorists stop traffic there in order to make room for themselves and use the free track for a race.
Last August, a dozen drivers were caught near Kirchheim unter Teck, three months earlier there were even 18 riders on the A8 at Merklingen.
A81 is the most popular "race track"
On the A81, the police register even more races than on any other federal highway.
A speed limit is used to try to slow down the speeders on the particularly affected section between narrowness and Geisingen.
The mostly high-priced and mutilated sports and luxury bodies often have Swiss license plates, because the drivers dodge to Germany because of the high penalties for too fast driving and car racing in the neighboring country.
For the SPD, the speed limit must not be reduced to a few routes: "With a general speed limit of 130 km / h, we would be able to deal with this problem on motorways," says Martin Rivoir, the transport expert of the SPD parliamentary group in the state parliament.
"The obstacle threshold for racers would be significantly higher if you are not allowed to travel here and there legally with 200 km / h and more".
Rivoir thinks less of enlightenment or image campaigns: "Anyone who in such a way overrides all rules and puts not only his own life, but also the life of other road users at risk, is hardly reachable with reason".
ADAC calls for stronger police intervention
On the other hand, this is not enough for the ADAC: "We assume that Raser will not be deterred by the speed limits," says Holger Bach, Head of Transport and Environment at ADAC Württemberg.
It calls for additional and tougher controls on the affected routes.
It is not uncommon for the high-touring power test to be painful and severe: Since January 2019 and until April 2020, three people have died in the races nationwide, two of them uninvolved in a nightly crash in Stuttgart's city centre and one in Gerlingen.
There, two young men are said to have completed a car race in November.
One of the vehicles came off the road, bounced against a garden wall and remained on the side, the 18-year-old passenger died.
21 more people were injured in the races of the past two years.
However, in the opinion of Interior Minister Thomas Strobl, stricter penalties are not necessary: "Legislative action is not required to sanction illegal motor vehicle races harder," says the paper of the Ministry of the Interior.
Blue light from July 23: Thirsty burglar steals drinks from snacks
Rohrdorf: A man broke into a snack on Thursday in Rohrdorf (Calw district) and stole drinks and cash.
A witness heard noise in the valley road around 3.40 a.m. and ran towards the snack bar.
There he noticed a man who used to drink at the fridge and then left the snack through a previously opened entrance door.
The perpetrator fled towards the meadows behind the snack.
According to the police, the burglar also used a cash register and stole cash in the low three-digit range.
The suspect is described as follows: He is about 1.75 to 1.80 meters tall and of strong stature.
In fact, he wore a black hoodie, black pants and bright shoes.
The police accept further testimony.
Ackermann sprints to victory on final stage at Sibiu Tour
Radprofi Pascal Ackermann won his second day victory on the final stage of the 10th Sibiu Tour.
The 26-year-old Pfälzer from Team Bora-hansgrohe won the mass sprint on the 109 km long section with start and finish in Sibiu, after he had already won a stage on Saturday.
It was the season's three and four victories for Ackermann.
In the overall standings, his Austrian teammate Gregor Mühlberger prevailed.
The 26-year-old had masterfully won the mountain time trial in the morning and thus took over the top of the class.
Only 104 drivers were left in the evening for the final stage.
No less than 18 starters had fallen victim to the time limit in the mountain time trial.
"I'm really happy to start the new season with a win," Ackermann explained after his success on Saturday.
"The sprint was really hectic," said the 26-year-old.
300 meters before the finish, he simply put on his sprint, "and it worked perfectly".
According to the rules of the World Federation UCI, a Corona test was carried out six days before the start of the race.
During the entire tour, drivers and supervisors were separated in insulated hygiene bubbles from the organizing team and the media.
Spectators at the start and finish were not allowed.
Control center gave instruction to lay reanimation
Düsseldorf - Tragic accident on Sunday afternoon in Düsseldorf-Garath.
In an apartment house, a child (4) suddenly lay lifeless in the water while bathing.
According to the fire department, the emergency call was received at just before 13: 00.
"A control center dispatcher immediately gave instructions for layman reanimation," a fire service spokesman said to BILD.
The rescuers arrived a little later and took the resuscitation measures.
The child in danger of life was transported to the university hospital under reanimation.
Why it died is unclear.
The police routinely began the investigation into the accident.
The fire service spokesman: "We assume a tragic accident in the apartment".
Nuremberg: Unapproved tuning meeting - police intervenes, 700 vehicles and around 1100 people
Hundreds of cars and temporarily over 1000 people took part in a "tuning meeting" on Saturday night in the parking lot of a furniture store.
The police implemented their announcement to intensify the control of such events.
A big tuning meeting took place on Saturday evening (July 25, 2020) in Nuremberg's Südstadt.
Several hundred vehicles were involved.
According to the police in central Franconia, an increased volume of vehicles in the area of a large parking lot in Ingolstädter Straße had been determined by the Nuremberg traffic police at around 10.30 p.m..
The police then carried out a large number of vehicle inspections there.
Only recently, the police had announced that they would step up the fight against so-called Autoposers.
Illegal tuning meeting in Nuremberg: Only a small part of the "scene"
The officers counted to the top about 700 vehicles and about 1100 people, the police accounted for.
Of this, however, only a small part of those present are to be attributed to the "Autoposer" and tuning scene.
Apparently, most of the relevant scene followed the appeal of the police.
On the basis of the vehicles and people on site, it can be assumed that these were predominantly spectators.
In addition, the overwhelming proportion of those present adhered to the prevailing infection protection provisions, in particular compliance with the minimum distance and wearing a word-of-mouth protection.
The control measures carried out on the ground were completed at 1: 00 a.m.
All in all, the officials found such structural changes in 10 vehicles that the operating permit had expired.
Four of these vehicles had to be secured.
No car races
There were no illegal car races.
"The police headquarters of Central Franconia will continue to keep an eye on what is happening and will continue to carry out enhanced control measures, also in connection with the advent of spectators," it said.
The agency News5 spoke to Jürgen Schrödinger of the towing company involved: "They all have beautiful rims, we must not scratch them," says Schrödinger.
For this, special tapes would be used.
Also because the cars are wider, the company must be careful not to make any damage.
"After all, the young people are supposed to get their cars back without prejudice."
Employment Agency figures: 900 suspected cases of abuse of short-time work
Berlin - The Federal Employment Agency (BA), according to its own statement, investigates about 900 suspected cases of abuse of the short-time work allowance.
"This is extremely little for more than 880,000 companies that have reported short-time work," said Daniel Terzenbach, Executive Board member responsible for operational business, of the "Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung".
When, at the beginning of the Corona crisis, many companies suddenly applied for short-time work, the BA had to react quickly.
Usually the test takes up to three weeks.
"So much time was not available to us in this hot phase.
We will therefore take a closer look at the final accounts.
Certainly there will be a lot to follow.
We are not naive and have a long breath. "
Evidence of abuse often comes from the affected employees or trade unions.
In addition, use the BA analysis software to detect abuse patterns.
According to Terzenbach, the BA is preparing for a possible wave of insolvency in autumn.
"Will there be significantly more insolvencies than in the previous year?
The assessments differ, but we prepare ourselves for the case and already now train our employees in the employment agencies for the processing of applications for insolvency money ".
The figures are still inconspicuous, said Terzenbach.
World Heritage in Potsdam: Party in the New Garden dissolved
Potsdam - On Friday evening about 40 young people celebrated a party in the New Garden.
The collection was dissolved at 8.48 p.m. by the district drivers of the Stiftung Preußische Schlösser und Gärten (SPSG), the foundation announced on PNN request.
The teenagers then left the park.
On Saturday evening, some young people would have played rugby in the New Garden.
SPSG spokesman Frank Kallensee said on Sunday that the meadow had been cleared by district drivers.
Time and again there are illegal celebrations in the parks
In the Foundation's parks, accumulations occur time and again, in which the distance and hygiene rules COVID-19 Ordinance are not complied with.
At the end of June there was a celebration with about 300 people in the park Babelsberg, a week later about 150 people celebrated in the New Garden.
Even without a coronary order, the parks are closed at nightfall.
The storage on the meadows is prohibited according to park regulations, there are only a few exceptions.
The Foundation has been complaining for a long time that visitors are leaving more and more waste and destroying protected biotopes.
In Berlin, illegal park parties have meanwhile reached a different dimension.
In the Hasenheide in the district of Neukölln, 5000 people celebrated an illegal techno party on Sunday night.
The event was dissolved by the police.
Austria: Mass tests after Corona eruption in tourist resort
With hundreds of tests, authorities have responded to a Corona outbreak in the popular Upper Austrian tourist resort of St. Wolfgang.
The number of confirmed cases rose to 48, as reported by the state authorities in Linz.
More than 100 results were still pending in the evening.
According to this, many of the infected are young interns in tourism companies, but at least one holiday guest has also been tested positive.
Residents, guests and tourism staff were asked to stay in their accommodation on Saturday night.
The closing hour was set at 23: 00.
"There are cancellations and cancellations there and there" of bookings, said the head of the tourism association Wolfgangsee, Hans Wieser, the dpa.
Some of the guests also left early.
St. Wolfgang is the most important tourist resort in Upper Austria, with more than 400,000 overnight stays last year.
In a normal season, about a third of the guests are Germans.
On Friday, the first infections had become publicly known.
The head of the district authority, Alois Lanz, defended on Saturday the behavior of the interns, who had celebrated in several restaurants and could have been infected there.
"We all liked to do this in our youth," he said to the radio station Ö1.
However, two bars were closed on Friday to prevent further infections.
The tourism association launched an information campaign to raise awareness among young employees about the dangers of COVID-19.
From Saturday, hundreds of employees, holidaymakers and locals were tested.
In addition, all guests who were in St. Wolfgang from 15 July were contacted.
The eruption evokes memories of the Austrian ski and party resort of Ischgl in Tyrol, which in the early phase of the pandemic was a center of the Corona spread throughout Europe.
In total, more than 1500 people in Austria are currently infected with the virus.
The focus of new infections is on Vienna and Upper Austria.
Premier League: Man United and Chelsea qualified for Champions League
London (dpa) - England's record holder Manchester United returns to the Champions League after a year of absence.
The Red Devils secured third place in the Premier League on the final day of the season with a 2 – 0 (0 – 0) victory over direct rival Leicester City.
The Foxes now have to settle for the Europa League because Chelsea passed by and qualified for the premier class.
In the fight against the relegation, Aston Villa was able to cheer.
Manchester United were led by Bruno Fernandes (71st minute).
After a red card for Leicester City in the postseason, Jesse Lingard (90. + 8.) hit the finish line.
Chelsea, in the Champions League eighth round opponent of FC Bayern, won 2: 0 (2: 0) against the Wolverhampton Wanderers thanks to Mason Mount (45. + 1) and Olivier Giroud (45. + 4).
"That means a lot to me," said coach Frank Lampard, who in his first season as Chelsea coach is also in the final of the FA Cup against Arsenal.
Chelsea's victory against Wolverhampton also benefited Tottenham Hotspur, who passed by the Wolves with a meager 1: 1 (1: 0) at Crystal Palace and finished sixth in the Europa League.
Aston Villa won the long-distance duel with Watford and Bournemouth, but had to wait a long time for West Ham United to maintain their class.
The late leadership of Jack Grealish (84.) immediately compensated Andrey Yarmolenko (85.).
Watford lost 2 – 3 (1 – 3) to Arsenal.
The club, which had three coaches in the season, relegated after five first-league years.
Just like Bournemouth, who couldn't save himself by a 3: 1 (2: 1) at Everton.
In the end, one point was missing.
Liverpool, who has been the England champions since the end of June, won a club record with a 3 – 1 (1 – 1) win at Newcastle United.
99 points are the highest score the Reds have ever scored in a football season.
Coach Jürgen Klopp and his team narrowly missed the points record in English football.
The record holder is Manchester City with 100 points in the 2017 – 18 season.
After the Newcastle lead in the first minute, Virgil van Dijk (38th), Divock Origi (59th) and Sadio Mané (89th) made the game on Sunday for Liverpool.
"For this wonderful club it was an extraordinary season," said scorer van Dijk after the match, "that should encourage us to defend the title.
It will be difficult. "
In the end, the Premier League bosses should also be satisfied.
Due to the Coronavirus crisis, football operations in England were interrupted from 13 March to 17 June.
In the meantime, even a premature demolition of the remaining games on neutral ground was discussed.
After all, the season could be played without special events to the end - however, as in Germany without spectators in the stadiums.
Arrests and violence in demonstrations against Netanyahu
The protests in Israel against Prime Minister Netanyahu are becoming increasingly violent.
During the night there were violent clashes.
On the night of Sunday in Jerusalem, the Israeli police violently attacked participants in a demonstration against right-wing conservative Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu.
Twelve people were arrested for participating in riots, police spokesman Micky Rosenfeld said.
The police used water cannons to dismantle the rally.
According to media reports, around 6000 people had gathered in the vicinity of Netanyahu's office on Saturday evening.
They protested against unemployment, corruption and Netanyahu's handling of the Corona crisis.
The protesters beat drums, blew horns, and called on Netanyahu to resign.
Participants in a counter-demonstration who supported Netanyahu were also arrested, the news site "ynet" reported.
Also in many other places in Israel, people demonstrated, including in front of the head of government's private villa in the coastal city of Caesarea and in a park in Tel Aviv.
According to police reports, a man was arrested near Tel Aviv because he was suspected of spraying pepper spray from a driving car on protesters on the roadside.
Another man was arrested after a stabbing attack on a demonstrator in the south of the country.
The protester was slightly injured at the neck.
In Jerusalem and Tel Aviv there have been several demonstrations against Netanyahu.
The rallies accompany the corruption process against the head of government.
Most recently, Netanyahu was also criticized for his handling of the Corona crisis.
He has been accused of premature loosening and a lack of preparation for a second corona wave.
The Corona crisis has severely affected the country ’ s economy.
The unemployment rate was more than 20 percent.
The number of new infections with the coronavirus in Israel has recently risen to record levels.
Accident at Ahlen (NRW) - Transporter crashes on car - nine injured - Ruhrgebiet - Bild.de
Ahlen - A rear-end collision on Saturday afternoon on the B58 near Ahlen caused nine minor injuries.
A motorist was on the road with her two children (3, 5) towards Beckum.
The police: "Probably she had suddenly slowed down because she wanted to turn off."
This must have been seen too late by the driver of a Mercedes van driving behind her.
He crashed on the back of the car.
In the accident, three passengers in the car and six in the van were slightly injured.
Several ambulances took her to a nearby hospital.
North Korea closes border city after Corona suspected case
North Korea has so far seen a "brilliant success" in its own measures to defend the coronavirus.
Now the country is reporting on a suspected case for the first time.
Because of a first official corona suspicion in the country, North Korea has completely closed off a big city for fear of a catastrophe.
Despite the strictest epidemiological defenses in the past six months, "the malignant virus may have been introduced into the country," the state media reported.
For the region around the border town Kaesong the state of emergency had been imposed.
The Communist leadership declared the highest level of alarm.
If the suspected case is confirmed, it would be the first official infection case with Sars-CoV-2 in the isolated country.
North Korea had so far not registered a single infection and described its defenses as "brilliant success".
The information was disputed abroad.
The disease symptoms were reportedly found in a "outlier" who illegally crossed the military demarcation line between South and North Korea on 19 July.
The person had settled down three years ago in South Korea and had now returned across the border.
For the crossing of the border within the four kilometres wide and largely still mined military buffer zone, there was initially no confirmation from South Korea.
According to reports from the national news agency Yonhap, South Korea's military acknowledged the possibility of an illegal border crossing to North Korea as high.
There have been investigations into some people.
North Korea called an emergency meeting of the Workers' Party's Politburo, chaired by Kim Jong Un, on Saturday because of the suspicion.
The "dangerous situation in Kaesong could trigger a deadly and destructive catastrophe".
Kim had already ordered on Friday as a preventive measure to "completely block Kaesong and isolate each district and the region from others," it continued.
The affected person and all the people in Kaesong who had been in contact with her were quarantined.
The central military commission of the party should therefore investigate the "outbreak" and the behavior of the responsible military unit and, if necessary, impose a hard punishment.
It is estimated that about 300,000 people live in Kaesong.
Excitement before Council meeting: City-East and noise protection are still to be discussed before a big summer break
"In addition to environmental issues, the members of the committee will also vote on the development plan for the major city development east project", it is rather casual in the middle section of the urban press release for the next municipal council meeting on Tuesday, July 28, at 4.30 p.m. in the Great Hall of the CongressCentrum Pforzheim.
In particular, the upgrading of the eastern city is controversial until the end.
The majorities for this are scarce, most recently in individual committees, depending on the presence even rejecting.
An appeal from the economy (construction, real estate, trade and IT), the project developed out of the citizenship and then by the administration and the municipal council not to let now fail after almost ten years of preparation, criticized project opponent Reinhard Klein as "extra-parliamentary opposition", "unsuspecting", "speculation", "vilification" and "deliberate false statements".
"Everyone thinks they know better," says Klein, who has been a member of the municipal council for a year as the only representative of the Pforzheim citizens' list.
In fact, after reading the treaties, he was in this position: "I know what I am talking about".
The exit is cheaper for the city, the Technical Town Hall is contrary to the statements of the city administration after subsidies, the existence of which Klein is convinced to renovate for 8.5 million euros.
The city will develop quite differently from the forecast in the town hall and on the part of the proponents of the economy.
One day after Klein, the FDP / FW / UB / LED faction, which also rejects the project, presented an alternative concept.
It also essentially envisages the refurbishment of the Technical Town Hall, the openness of the Schloßberg, the rental of the former valley for administrative areas and a more small-scale downtown redesign ideally with local authorities.
Environmental issues play a central role
In addition, environmental issues in particular will play a central role.
Among other things, the municipal council will vote on the noise action plan.
This includes various measures to protect the population of Pforzheim from health noise pollution caused by road traffic, including often temporary reductions.
In a press release, the local Transport Club Germany welcomes the widespread introduction of Tempo 30. However, the political leaders in the city are not innocent of the fact that this must happen because they have only contributed to the massive increase in car traffic and thus to the noise due to neglect of bus services with thinned out intervals and little commitment to cycling, the VCD says.
The municipal council also votes on the participation of the city of the energy and climate protection agency Pforzheim / Enzkreis.
In addition, the agenda includes the accession to the climate protection pact of the state of Baden-Württemberg, the reestablishment of the parental contributions in the urban day care facilities and the application for admission to the smart city funding of the federal government.
Citizens are welcome, but must take Corona protection measures into account.
Tim Zimmermann starts the new season with a lot of delay
With a delay of almost half a year, Tim Zimmermann will start his debut season at the ADAC GT Masters on 31 July.
Before the league of supercars can start regular operation, the first test runs were now planned.
For Zimmermann, it was mainly about getting to know his Lamborghini Huracan GT3 more closely.
The Corona crisis has long prevented Tim Zimmermann from embarking on his first business trip in the new Lamborghini Huracan from Grasser Racing.
This was now possible under special hygiene conditions.
The 23-year-old Langenargener made his first laps on the Lausitzring and was able to get used to his premiere in the GT3 car.
"There are a few things that are different from the Porsche from the preseason," says Zimmermann.
"With ABS, for example, you have to go into the curves differently.
But it really was a lot of fun ".
Zimmermann also had fun with Steijn Schothorst, with whom he will share his orange sports car in the GT Masters.
Despite his only 25 years of experience in GT sports, the Dutchman has been able to help his new teammate in many things.
"I'm not a beginner in motorsport, but every new series brings new challenges," says Zimmermann.
"Steijn and I understand each other blindingly and we have made enormous progress at the Lausitzring from session to session."
Right there - at the Lausitzring - the GT Masters will also hold its first race.
From 31 July, the 33 supercars will race through the Lausitz.
Zimmermann, who is one of 15 series newcomers, knows the track.
In 2015, he was a guest at the Motodrom.
"It worked quickly and I didn't have to get used to the track much," says Zimmermann, who starts for the Friedrichshafener Renngemeinschaft Graf Zeppelin.
"The Lausitzring has many fast passages that you have to meet optimally in order to be fast".
How fast Zimmermann really is, that turns out in two weeks.
"Of course, the teams are poking a bit during the tests," he says.
"Finally, however, we are very satisfied and are looking forward to the first weekend at the Lausitzring".
The race in Brandenburg will be the prelude to a densely crowded calendar.
Seven races are due to start in early November.
The current status is that no spectators will be admitted - but there is a prominent guest.
In mid-August at the Nürburgring, ex-Formula 1 driver Niko Hülkenberg will grab the GT steering wheel.
British Transport Minister caught cold by quarantine decision
The British government ’ s decision to quarantine Spanish tourists for two weeks on their return has caught the country ’ s Minister of Transport cold, according to press reports.
According to this, Grant Shapps is currently on holiday in Spain of all places, while his colleagues at home decided on the measure on Saturday.
Due to the rising corona numbers in Spain, the Cabinet in London removed the country from the list of countries from which it is possible to enter without quarantine.
The new scheme will apply from today, Sunday, so Shapps will also have to quarantine after his return.
In Austria, the government has also imposed quarantine measures for returnees.
But the rule applies to those who are just on the day of vacation, only from Saturday, August 1, and was not introduced overnight.
By the way, Spain is one of the "safe countries" in Austria, for which no quarantine is needed in Austria.
"Many ministers should have known beforehand that there is a possibility that a quarantine will be imposed on holiday makers in Spain," commented Labour MP Diane Abbot.
"But apparently no one bothered to tell Grant Shapps."
Almost a month after the end of the Corona emergency in Spain and the expiration of the strict curfew, the number of infections in the country rises again.
Virologists mainly blame the nightlife for the new spread.
Spain is one of the UK's favourite holiday destinations.
The British government is currently advising against unnecessary travel to the Spanish mainland, the Canary Islands and Balearic Islands, which are particularly popular with British holidaymakers, are exempted from this.
So far, more than 272,000 infections with the novel coronavirus and more than 28,000 deaths have been registered in Spain.
Russia: Marine Day: Putin Announces Hypersonic Weapons for Warships
Russian President Vladimir Putin has announced on the day of the Navy in his country that the warships will be equipped with the most modern hypersonic weapons.
With these weapons unique in the world, the fighting possibilities of the Russian naval forces would be expanded, Putin said on Sunday in St. Petersburg at the central naval parade.
According to Interfax, the Ministry of Defense also informed the agency about successful tests of the Zirkon hypersonic rocket built for the Navy.
The Hypersonic Weapons have a multiple of the speed of sound of about 343 meters per second.
They are considered weapons of the future.
Underwater Tropedeo to be built further
It was also built on the atomically usable underwater torpedo Poseidon.
The planned sea drone is planned for the destruction of coastal targets.
The president, who himself also drove a military boat, said that this year alone 40 new ships would be put into service with the individual fleet associations of the largest country on earth.
Russia has such a large coastal area as no other country in the world.
For 300 years, the Navy has been reliably protecting Russia, Putin said on the day celebrated nationwide by sailors.
Also in many other Russian coastal towns, the Naval Forces celebrated the Day of the Navy with parades.
In Syria, where Russia is fighting alongside Bashar al-Assad, the military demonstrated strength at a weapons show in the Mediterranean port of Tartu.
Ammunition was also fired there.
A video released by the Ministry of Defense showed not only warships, including a submarine, but also combat helicopters and jets.
Hurricane "Hanna" reaches Texas: Help made difficult because of Corona
Washington - The first hurricane of this year's season across the Atlantic has landed in Texas.
Life-threatening floods, strong winds and heavy rainfall now threaten parts of the US state, the National Hurricane Center of the US Climate Agency (NOAA) reported on Sunday (local time) at night.
Governor Greg Abbott declared a state of emergency for many districts.
The Texas Corona pandemic made the work of the helpers harder, Abbott continued, according to the US media.
Evacuated people called to caution
"Every hurricane is a huge challenge," Abbott said, according to the Houston Chronicle.
In view of the hurricane in Texas, he added, "This challenge is complicated and aggravated, considering that it sweeps through an area that is the state's most affected area by Covid-19."
According to the Johns Hopkins University, the corona pandemic has killed around 5,000 people in Texas alone.
Abbott called people who had to leave their homes to be careful.
They should not disregard practices "we have become accustomed to", such as wearing masks, said the governor according to CBS.
It was important that everyone kept a distance.
For this reason, hotel rooms were also provided in some places.
In addition, it should be tested in emergency shelters on Corona.
Damage was initially reported only from the coastal town of Port Mansfield.
Storm warning withdrawn again
With wind speeds of up to 150 kilometres per hour, "Hanna", according to authorities, was hit on land on the island of Padre Island just off the Texas coast.
The tropical storm had previously been upgraded to the lowest level hurricane.
For the coastal section from Port Mansfield to Sargent, a storm surge warning was issued and later withdrawn.
Authorities expected a weakening, while "Hanna" moved inland and headed for northeastern Mexico.
"Douglas" moves to Hawaii
In the Pacific, Hurricane "Douglas" travelled to Hawaii overnight on Sunday with wind speeds of around 150 kilometres per hour.
The hurricane center, however, expected to weaken further.
According to the forecast, it should be near the largest islands of Hawaii on Sunday (local time) - then as a storm just below the hurricane threshold.
Over the Atlantic, NOAA anticipated an above-average hurricane season this year after a May forecast.
From June to the end of November, up to ten hurricanes could be expected, of which up to six could be very strong cyclones, the authority said.
On average, there are six hurricanes per year across the Atlantic, three of which develop into storms of great strength.
In view of the available climate data and the higher water temperature in the Atlantic and the Caribbean, the probability of a normal season is only 30 percent, the one below average even only 10 percent, it was said back then.
US President Donald Trump wrote on Twitter that his government closely monitors the storms and is in contact with the affected states.
Four goals removed: Video assistant "punished" Sassuolo
Sassuolos Filip Djuricic were stripped of two goals
Naples - Four goals scored, four goals cancelled: Sassuolo Calcio experienced a raven black evening at the 0-2 (0: 1) SSC Naples in the Italian football league Serie A - and was really angry at the video assistant of the referee.
"A festival of not given gates for Sassuolo.
The VAR has never been so tough against a team, "commented the" Corriere dello Sport ".
Hosts Naples had gone through a goal by defender Elseid Hisaj in the 8th minute, in the 32nd minute Filip Djuricic initially cheered the balance.
The video assistant referee (VAR) took the hit back because of a side position.
Five minutes later, Djuricic shot the ball into the net again - again the VAR intervened.
The gates of attackers Francesco Caputo (50th) and Domenico Berardi (61st) also withdrew the referee team after the VAR had hinted.
In the aftermath Allan made the 2-0 finish for Naples and the bitter evening for Sassuolo perfect.
"The VAR is worse for Sassuolo than a radar trap on the road and punishes Sassuolo like no team before.
The new technology sets records, "writes the" Gazzetta dello Sport ".
FC Bayern MÃ1 ⁄ 4nchen: Pavard injured
Munich (dpa) - The start of the hot preparation phase for the Champions League began with a setback for Doublesieger FC Bayern.
After a short holiday and a few training days, Hansi Flick, who has recovered "reasonably well", has to think about how he can transform his successful defenses after the injury of world champion Benjamin Pavard.
The Frenchman, who has the third most minutes of use behind captain Manuel Neuer and midfielder Joshua Kimmich, suffered a ligament injury at the left foot root and threatens to miss in decisive Königsklassen-Duellen.
In the Munich smuddle weather, the right-back broke off a training game and was driven off the pitch with a golf kart.
How long the unrestricted regular player has to pause in the fight for the title is open.
The 24-year-old can hope for the final tournament to begin on 12 August in Lisbon.
But the Bavarians do not want to be stopped by the misfortune from the training on Sunday.
In his personal triple formula, Flick called the three attributes he wants to see from his stars on the way to Portugal's capital.
Quality, intensity and concentration are to show his victorious title collectors in the ideally following 28 days until the Königsklassen-Endspiel on August 23.
"We have mastered the compulsory tasks with championship and trophy simply excellently.
Now it is time to create something special, "Flick said.
Until the Munich team can deal with the final tournament and previously a training camp in the Algarve, the eighth final obligation against FC Chelsea is due.
After the 3-0 in the first leg before the Corona break, the Londoners should not become the Bavarian nightmare again in the home arena like in the lost "Finale dahoam" 2012.
"We have to go through the door.
We want to win, create good conditions and build trust with a good game, "Flick demanded.
A test for the match is scheduled for Friday against Olympique Marseille.
With a long speech, Flick had sworn in his stars, who had 13 days of vacation after the double, to a unique August.
He welcomed 31 players on Säbener Strasse, including the new players around high-end shopping Leroy Sané, who first met all new colleagues on the pitch after his change from Manchester City.
"Leroy, like all the newcomers, fits in well," Flick said.
But instead of talking about the new season, when Sané & Co. can no longer just train, Flick preferred to talk about the current title project of the German series champion.
After days of individual and small group training, the team strength is now being trained for the Londoners, who, unlike the flick-ensemble, are in the rhythm of playing.
In the semi-finals, Real Madrid, Manchester City or Juventus Turin are possible opponents.
A way to the final in Lisbon "is not that easy", stressed the head coach, who can trust from Tuesday on the services of his new assistant Miroslav Klose in training.
The World Cup scorer Klose and Flick know from so many common tournament preparation, what is particularly important in the 0-to-100 set-up.
With his current team, working is "a pleasure," Flick praised.
The "focus on profits" is an impressive feature of his team.
In the tournament with nine teams, it was also ambitious on Sunday.
All of the top performers were there, including Thiago and defender David Alaba, whose whereabouts are not assured beyond the royal season.
Formula 1 needs a special rule to select its world champion
Since it is not possible to drive on the required number of continents, the FIA must improvise to award the World Cup titles.
All races were cancelled.
Racing calendar is becoming more and more concrete
The racing calendar of the current Formula 1 season continues to take shape.
In addition to the ten confirmed Grand Prix, three other race tracks were added during the week.
In October, the Nürburgring will be held in Germany and in Portimão, Portugal.
On the first of November, Lewis Hamilton and Co. compete for World Championship points at the traditional Italian race track in Imola.
This means that the 2020 racing calendar currently comprises 13 races.
"We are pleased to continue to make great progress in completing our plans for the 2020 season," said Formula 1 boss Chase Carey.
A total of 15 to 18 races in the premier class of motorsport are scheduled for this extraordinary season.
The Formula 1 will conclude its season in Asia.
The final race calendar is to be fixed and published in the coming weeks.
Prior to the already officially scheduled races in Bahrain and Abu Dhabi in December, according to media reports, appearances could still take place in Vietnam and Malaysia at the end of November.
Regulations require races on three continents
The regulations of Formula 1 require at least races on three continents for the award of the World Cup.
Even if, as currently planned, only two continents will be driven, there will be a world champion.
With the help of a special rule, the FIA wants to award the titles based on "extraordinary circumstances" due to the coronavirus pandemic.
The traditional start of the season in Australia in March had to be cancelled at short notice due to the onset of the Corona crisis.
A return to the continent this year is not an issue.
In addition, Formula 1 will not be a guest in America this year.
Cancellation meets with criticism in Brazil
Due to the tense corona situation, the races will not take place in Canada, the USA, Mexico and Brazil.
"We look forward to being back next season," Carey said.
The refusal of the American races met with criticism, especially in Brazil: "The refusal did not come as a surprise for us, but we cannot accept the reasons for it," said Tamas Rohonyi, promoter of the Grand Prix in São Paulo.
Infection rates in the São Paulo area are significantly lower than in other regions of Brazil.
The concerns of some teams not wanting to drive in Brazil would also not justify a refusal.
We are prepared for the required safety measures.
Greta Thunberg: Evil look against Donald Trump went around the world
Greta Thunberg spoke about her encounter with US President Donald Trump.
Greta Thunberg was a guest on Stephen Colbert ’ s famous latenight show by videoclip and revealed in an interview what she had in mind when she met Donald Trump.
Klimaatkivistin Greta Thunberg was a guest on a popular US latenight show via a video switch.
Among other things, she told of her fight against the powerful in the world.
The teenager also talked about her famous "evil eye" when she met Donald Trump.
New York City - Over the past two years, climate activist Greta Thunberg has attracted attention with her tireless commitment to the "Fridays For Future" movement.
Now she talked about her plans for the future in a well-known latenight show, as well as her encounter with US President Donald Trump at the UN Climate Summit last year.
Latenight presenter Stephen Colbert welcomed 17-year-old Thunberg on your show on Tuesday and conducted a longer interview with the Swede.
She talked not only about her fight against climate change, but also about her conflict with the powerful in the world.
"There are a few things that surprised me," she said.
"How far people go to direct the focus away from the climate crisis," she said, shaking.
"Everything from organized hate campaigns to threats just because a group of children is taking to the streets," she said.
Heads of state and leading politicians who ridicule them on social media or even try to silence them, find them "funny" because the reactions show them "because they have no other answer to it".
It became particularly interesting at the end of the interview when Greta Thunberg was approached on a well-known scene in which she cast a bitter evil eye after US President Trump.
At the UN Climate Summit 2019 in New York, for which the nude woman sailed across the Atlantic, her expressive gaze was captured by the cameras and has since been seen by countless people on the Internet.
The short clip resulted in a GIF, an animated image that ultimately became one of the most commonly used images for Trump opponents.
But what did the 17-year-old think about the US president at the moment?
To the relatively open question asked by Stephen Colbert, she replied only briefly and dry: "To be honest, I think that does not require any further explanation".
The experienced satirist Colbert had probably not reckoned with the beatable answer and briefly disappeared laughing from the picture.
With her "How dare you?" speech on the principles of climate protection, she was remembered by many at the climate conference.
Ex-Dortmunder Immobile with three-pack for Lazio Rome
Ciro Immobile is now in the race for Europe's Golden Shoe on par with Bavaria's Robert Lewandowski.
The former Dortmunder Ciro Immobile still has the best chances to become the top scorer in the Italian football championship.
The former BVB pro contributed three goals in Lazio's 5-1 (1: 1) win at Hellas Verona, including two penalty shootouts in the aftermath of both halves.
Thus, the 30-year-old from the standingfourth has now 34 season goals on his account - just as many Robert Lewandowski from FC Bayern Munich scored in the last Bundesliga season.
In Italy Cristiano Ronaldo follows with so far 30 goals, the Portuguese superstar met with the leader in the evening still on Sampdoria Genoa.
Fleetwood Mac co-founder Peter Green died
His life was like a roller coaster ride: After a rapid ascent with Fleetwood Mac, it went steeply downhill and then slowly up again.
Now the blues rock guitarist Peter Green has died at the age of 73.
Ingenious guitarist, drug junkie, cult fan: The co-founder of the band Fleetwood Mac, Peter Green, is dead.
He died peacefully in his sleep at the age of 73, family members announced in an official statement on Saturday that another statement would be announced for the next few days.
Top musicians like Peter Frampton recognized Green as one of the best blues and rock guitarists.
Mick Fleetwood spoke in an emotional reaction of a "monumental loss" for all former and present members of the band Fleetwood Mac.
The drummer Fleetwood and the guitarist Green had founded the now legendary band in London in 1967, until today his dreamy instrumental hit "Albatross" is unforgettable.
The life of the musician ("The End Of The Game", "In The Skies") resembled a rollercoaster ride.
With Fleetwood Mac Green experienced a rapid rise - the band celebrated their greatest successes but then without him.
It is said that there have been disputes, among other things, because Green wanted to donate all the group's profits to charitable causes.
He began to appear in wide robes and with great crucifix.
Psychological problems have also played a role.
Three years after its founding, Green left the band in 1970.
A social downturn followed.
The blues rock guitarist suffered from drug abuse and schizophrenia, as biographers reported.
For a long time, Green was treated in psychiatry.
During most of the 1970s, the musician disappeared from the scene.
He is said to have lived on the street for a time, worked as a cemetery gardener and spent a while in an Israeli kibbutz.
Green was born in 1946 to a Jewish working class family in Bethnal Green, London.
Already at a young age, he was enthusiastic about US blues musicians such as B.B. King and Muddy Waters.
At the age of eleven, he learned to play guitar.
At the age of 15, the teenager began to play guitar professionally and five years later got the chance to play as a lead guitarist for the instrumental band Peter B's Looners.
Shortly afterwards he was hired as a replacement for his idol Eric Clapton at the Bluesbreakers.
In the midst of the blues boom, Green founded Fleetwood Mac in the summer of 1967 along with his bluesbreakers colleagues Mick Fleetwood and John McVie.
The song "Albatross", composed by Green, gave the group the first number-one hit in the winter of 1968 / 69 and catapulted them to the top of the British music scene.
But the rapid rise soon revealed its dark side: Green did not cope with the media bustle, his experiments with the drug LSD became more and more extreme.
He later commented on the life between music and addiction in an interview: "The worst thing that happened to me in life is the drugs - the best thing was to land a number 1 hit".
Towards the end of the decade, Green surprisingly achieved an esteem success in 1979 with an album inspired by religious themes.
Fleetwood Mac, meanwhile, swam without him in a new formation on a wave of success.
Their 1977 album "Rumours" sold more than 40 million copies worldwide.
Despite several small solo successes, Green did not make a major comeback until he started again in 1996 with a group of friends.
The British "Daily Telegraph" spoke at that time of a rock star returning to Earth.
Green released several albums with the Peter Green Splinter Group until the band disbanded in 2004.
For music experts, he was already a blues legend during his lifetime - and with his gentle sound one of the most influential guitarists of the past decades.
